California, session 20252026, AB2031.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1516 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:1516. (a) Subject to Section 1510, any dividend, profit, distribution, interest, payment on principal, or other sum held or owing by a business association for or to its shareholder, certificate holder, member, bondholder, or other security holder, or a participating patron of a cooperative, who has not claimed it, or corresponded in writing with the business association concerning it, within three years after the date prescribed for payment or delivery, escheats to this state.(b) (1) Subject to Section 1510, any security or other intangible interest in a business association, as evidenced by the stock records or membership records of the holder, escheats to this state if both of the following conditions are satisfied:(b)(A) Subject to Section 1510, any intangible interest in a business association, as evidenced by the stock records The security or membership records of the association, escheats to this state if (1) the interest in the association is owned by a the person who for more than three years has neither claimed a dividend or other sum referred to in subdivision (a) nor corresponded in writing with the association holder or otherwise indicated an interest in the security or interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the association, and (2) the association does not know the location of the owner at the end of the three-year period. With respect to the interest, the business association shall be deemed the holder.(B) The holder does not know the location of the owner.(2) The holder shall be deemed to know the location of the owner for purposes of paragraph (1) and the security or other intangible interest in a business association shall not escheat if either of the following conditions is satisfied:(A) The business association or its agent issues dividends or other distributions to the owner and a dividend or other distribution is, at least once every three years, negotiated, redeemed, or automatically deposited in an owner’s account maintained by a third-party bank, financial institution, or other business association separate and apart from the business association that issued the dividend or other distribution.(B) The business association does not issue dividends or other distributions, or the business association issues dividends or other distributions that are automatically reinvested in the owner’s account, and the holder communicates with the owner via first class mail at least annually and the most recent communication is not returned as undeliverable.(3) If the holder’s most recent communication, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), is returned as undeliverable, the location of the owner shall be deemed unknown and the security or other intangible interest shall escheat three years after the later of the following:(A) The date of the owner’s most recent indication of interest in the security or interest.(B) The date that the communication sent by the holder or the holder’s agent to the owner is returned as undeliverable, unless the owner responds to any notice sent pursuant to subdivision (d) or otherwise subsequently indicates an interest in the security or interest prior to the date the security or interest is required to be reported pursuant to Section 1530.(4) If subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) does not apply and the business association or its agent issues a dividend or other distribution to the owner at least once per year, and over a three-year period none of those dividends or other distributions are negotiated, redeemed, or automatically deposited in an owner’s account maintained by a third-party bank, financial institution, or other business association separate and apart from the business association that issued the dividend or other distribution, and the owner has not otherwise indicated an interest in the security or other intangible interest from which the divided or distribution is derived for such period, the location of the owner shall be deemed unknown and the security or interest shall escheat unless the owner responds to any notice sent pursuant to subdivision (d) or otherwise subsequently indicated an interest in the security or interest prior to the date the security or interest is required to be reported pursuant to Section 1530.(c) Subject to Section 1510, any dividends or other distributions held for or owing to a person at the time the stock or other security to which they attach escheats to this state also escheat to this state as of the same time.(d) If the business association holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner, which the business association’s holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate, with respect to any interest that may escheat pursuant to subdivision (b), if no further action is taken by the business association owner prior to the next reporting deadline specified by Section 1530, the holder shall make reasonable efforts to notify the owner by mail or, if the owner has consented to electronic notice, electronically, that the owner’s interest in the business association will escheat to the state. The notice shall be given not less than 6 nor more than 12 months before the time the interest in the business association becomes reportable to the Controller in accordance with this chapter. The face of the notice shall contain a heading at the top that reads as follows: “THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA REQUIRES US TO NOTIFY YOU THAT YOUR UNCLAIMED PROPERTY MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE IF YOU DO NOT CONTACT US,” or substantially similar language. The notice required by this subdivision shall specify the time that the interest will escheat and the effects of escheat, including the necessity for filing a claim for the return of the interest. The notice required by this section shall, in boldface type or in a font a minimum of two points larger than the rest of the notice, exclusive of the heading, (1) specify that since the date of last activity, or for the last two years, there has been no owner activity on regarding the deposit, account, shares, or other interest; security; (2) identify the deposit, account, shares, or other interest security by number or identifier, which need not exceed four digits; (3) indicate that the deposit, account, shares, or other interest security is in danger of escheating to the state; and (4) specify that the Unclaimed Property Law requires business associations the holder to transfer funds of a deposit, account, shares, or other interest the security to the state if it the owner has been inactive for three years. years and the holder does not know the location of the owner. It shall also include a form, as prescribed by the Controller, by which the owner may confirm the owner’s current address. If that form is filled out, signed by the owner, and returned to the holder, it shall be deemed that the business association knows the location of the owner. In lieu of returning the form, the business association holder may provide a telephone number or other electronic means to enable the owner to contact the association. With that contact, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the business association, the business association shall be deemed to know the location of the owner. holder. The business association holder may impose a service charge on the deposit, account, shares, or other interest owner for this notice and form in an amount not to exceed the administrative cost of mailing or electronically sending the notice and form, and in no case to exceed two dollars ($2).(e) In addition to the notice required pursuant to subdivision (d), the holder may give additional notice as described in subdivision (d) at any time between the date of last activity by, or communication with, the owner and the date the holder transfers the deposit, shares, or other interest to the Controller.(f) The interest that escheats pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be reportable pursuant to Section 1530 unless and until the per share value, as set forth in Section 1172.80 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, is equal to or greater than one cent ($0.01) or the aggregate value of the security held exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000).(g) (1) This section applies to all securities or other intangible interests in business associations, regardless of whether they are held by the owner directly, through a brokerage account, or otherwise.(2) This section does not apply to a digital financial asset as defined in Section 3102 of the Financial Code.SECTION 1.Section 851 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:851.(a)Except as provided in subdivision (c), a public utility, other than a common carrier by railroad subject to Part A of the Interstate Commerce Act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), shall not sell, lease, assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of, or encumber the whole or any part of, its railroad, street railroad, line, plant, system, or other property necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, or any franchise or permit or any right thereunder, or by any means whatsoever, directly or indirectly, merge or consolidate its railroad, street railroad, line, plant, system, or other property, or franchises or permits or any part thereof, without first having either secured an order from the commission authorizing it to do so for qualified transactions valued above five million dollars ($5,000,000), or for qualified transactions valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, filed an advice letter and obtained approval from the commission authorizing it to do so. If the advice letter is uncontested, approval may be given by the executive director or the director of the division of the commission having regulatory jurisdiction over the utility. The commission shall determine the types of transactions valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, that qualify for advice letter handling. For a qualified transaction valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, the commission may designate a procedure different than the advice letter procedure if it determines that the transaction warrants a more comprehensive review. Absent protest or incomplete documentation, the commission shall approve or deny the advice letter within 90 days of its filing by the applicant public utility. The commission shall reject any advice letter that seeks to circumvent the five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) threshold by dividing a single asset with a value of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) into component parts, each valued at less than five million dollars ($5,000,000). Every sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, disposition, encumbrance, merger, or consolidation made other than in accordance with the advice letter and approval from the commission authorizing it is void. The permission and approval of the commission to the exercise of a franchise or permit under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1001) of Chapter 5, or the sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, or other disposition or encumbrance of a franchise or permit under this article, shall not revive or validate any lapsed or invalid franchise or permit, or enlarge or add to the powers or privileges contained in the grant of any franchise or permit, or waive any forfeiture.(b)(1)Subdivision (a) shall apply to any transaction described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 854.2.(2)For any transaction described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 854.2, as part of its review under subdivision (a), the commission shall determine whether the transaction is fair and reasonable to affected public utility employees, including both union and nonunion employees.(c)(1)Subdivision (a) shall not apply to an easement, or a change to an easement, that has a ratepayer financial impact valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less if a public utility that is a party to the qualified transaction has gross annual California revenues of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) or more.(2)On January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the threshold values specified in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.(3)Each public utility shall annually file a Tier 1 advice letter with the commission by April 1, with a report of all transactions performed pursuant to paragraph (1), enumerated by date, value, location, and party.(d)This section does not prevent the sale, lease, encumbrance, or other disposition by any public utility of property that is not necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, and any disposition of property by a public utility shall be conclusively presumed to be of property that is not useful or necessary in the performance of its duties to the public, as to any purchaser, lessee, or encumbrancer dealing with that property in good faith for value, provided that this section does not apply to the interchange of equipment in the regular course of transportation between connecting common carriers.